Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-831
Authority; receive loans, grants, and contributions.

The authority may receive and accept from any source loans
or grants for or in aid of the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, or renovation of
a project or any portion thereof, and receive and accept from any source loans,
grants, aid, or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of
value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such loans,
grants, aid, or contributions are made.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2928;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1728;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 31.